Utah statutes.
23-19-11.5.   Age restriction -- Proof of furharvester education required.
(1) (a)  A resident born after December 31, 1984, may not purchase a resident
furbearer license unless the applicant presents:
(i)  a certificate of completion of a division approved furharvester education
course; or
(ii)  an immediately preceding year's furbearer license with the furharvester
education number noted on the furbearer license.
(b)  Upon issuance of the resident furbearer license, the division or
authorized wildlife license agent shall indicate the applicant's furharvester
education number on the face of the furbearer license.
(2)  If an applicant for a resident furbearer license has completed a
furharvester education course in Utah but is not able to present a furbearer
license or a certificate of completion as provided in Subsection (1), the
division may research the division's furharvester education records to verify
that the applicant has completed a furharvester education course in Utah.
(3) (a)  If an applicant for a resident furbearer license has completed a
furharvester education course and is applying for a furbearer license through
the division's Internet site or other electronic means authorized by the
division, the applicant's Utah furharvester education number may constitute
proof of completion of a furharvester education course under this section.
(b)  The division may research the furharvester education number to verify
that the applicant has completed a division approved furharvester education
course.
(4)  The division may charge a fee for the service specified in Subsection
(2).
